Illinois, session 104th, SB2662.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The amount of $10,000,000, or so much of that 5amount as may be necessary, is appropriated from the General 6Revenue Fund to the Department of Commerce and Economic 7Opportunity for the purpose of awarding a grant to Omega Psi 8Phi Fraternity for costs associated with the Fraternity's 2028 9Grand Conclave. 10    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 112025.